Hawaii statutes.
§287-31 Reimbursement of insurer; proration
of insurance. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the
insured shall reimburse the insurance carrier for any payment the insurance
carrier would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy
except for this chapter.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide
for the prorating of the insurance thereunder with other valid and collectible
insurance. [L 1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-109; HRS §287-31]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next